tex/ukrhyph/ukrhypfa.pat.txt
щкап5
щка6
щє1д
щє1с
щ1щ
'ем5н
'е2
'ю6с
'ю6т
'єм5н
'є2
'1у
'1ю
'1я2
ьдос6
ьдо5
ьк5н
ьс1тин
ьс1тін
ьс1тїн
ьти5с
ьті5с
ьтї5с
ьхо2
ь1б
ь1ва
ь1ве
ь1ви
ь1вє
ь1ві
ь1г
ь1де
ь1дж
ь1ди
ь1дє
ь1ді
ь1дї
ь1е
ь1ж
ь1з
ь1к
ь1л
ь1м
ь1н
ь1п
ь1с
ь1т
ь1х
ь1ч
ь1ш
ь1щ
ь2к1ло
ь2нул
ь2сн
ь2сти
ь2сті
ь2стї
ь2ф1р
ь5др
ь5дь
ь5дя
ь5фе
ь5фє
ь5яс
ь6зн
ь6зя.
ь6мр
ь6мс
ь6шк
ь6ща
ь6ще
ь6щу
ь6щє
юг1н
юд1ж
юйдо6
юй2д1
юк1з
юк1н
юмини5
юміні5
юп5т
юс5к
ю1а
ю1ба
ю1бе
ю1би
ю1бо
ю1бу
ю1бью
ю1бьє
ю1бьі
ю1бю
ю1бя
ю1бє
ю1бі
ю1бї
ю1б
ю1ва
ю1ве
ю1ви
ю1во
ю1ву
ю1вью
ю1вьє
ю1вьі
ю1вю
ю1вя
ю1вє
ю1ві
ю1га
ю1ге
ю1ги
ю1го
ю1гу
ю1гью
ю1гьє
ю1гьі
ю1гю
ю1гя
ю1гє
ю1гі
ю1гї
ю1да
ю1де
ю1ди
ю1до
ю1ду
ю1дью
ю1дьє
ю1дьі
ю1дю
ю1дя
ю1дє
ю1ді
ю1дї
ю1е
ю1жа
ю1же
ю1жи
ю1жо
ю1жу
ю1жью
ю1жьє
ю1жьі
ю1жю
ю1жя
ю1жє
ю1жі
ю1жї
ю1за
ю1зе
ю1зи
ю1зо
ю1зу
ю1зью
ю1зьє
ю1зьі
ю1зю
ю1зя
ю1зє
ю1зі
ю1зї
ю1и
ю1ка
ю1ке
ю1ки
ю1ко
ю1ку
ю1кью
ю1кьє
ю1кьі
ю1кю
ю1кя
ю1кє
ю1кі
ю1кї
ю1ла
ю1ле
ю1ли
ю1ло
ю1лу
ю1лью
ю1льє
ю1льі
ю1лю
ю1ля
ю1лє
ю1ма
ю1ме
ю1ми
ю1мо
ю1му
ю1мью
ю1мьє
ю1мьі
ю1мю
ю1мя
ю1мє
ю1мі
ю1мї
ю1на
ю1не
ю1ни
ю1но
ю1ну
ю1нью
ю1ньє
ю1ньі
ю1ню
ю1ня
ю1нє
ю1ні
ю1о
ю1па
ю1пе
ю1пи
ю1по
ю1пу
ю1пью
ю1пьє
ю1пьі
ю1пю
ю1пя
ю1пє
ю1пі
ю1ра
ю1ре
ю1ри
ю1ро
ю1ру
ю1рью
ю1рьє
ю1рьі
ю1рю
ю1ря
ю1рє
ю1рі
ю1рї
ю1са
ю1се
ю1си
ю1со
ю1ста
ю1сте
ю1сти
ю1сто
ю1стр
ю1сту
ю1стью
ю1стьє
ю1стьі
ю1стю
ю1стя
ю1стє
ю1сті
ю1стї
ю1су
ю1сью
ю1сьє
ю1сьі
ю1сю
ю1ся
ю1сє
ю1сі
ю1сї
ю1та
ю1те
ю1ти
ю1то
ю1ту
ю1тью
ю1тьє
ю1тьі
ю1тю
ю1тя
ю1тє
ю1ті
ю1тї
ю1у
ю1фа
ю1фе
ю1фи
ю1фо
ю1фу
ю1фью
ю1фьє
ю1фьі
ю1фю
ю1фя
ю1фє
ю1фі
ю1фї
ю1ха
ю1хе
ю1хи
ю1хо
ю1ху
ю1хью
ю1хьє
ю1хьі
ю1хю
ю1хя
ю1хє
ю1хі
ю1хї
ю1ца
ю1це
ю1ци
ю1цо
ю1цу
ю1цє
ю1ці
ю1цї
ю1ша
ю1ше
ю1ши
ю1шо
ю1шу
ю1шью
ю1шьє
ю1шьі
ю1шє
ю1ші
ю1шї
ю1ща
ю1ще
ю1щи
ю1що
ю1щу
ю1щью
ю1щьє
ю1щьі
ю1щє
ю1щі
ю1щї
ю1я
ю1є
ю1і
ю1ї
ю2лі
ю2лї
ю5щ
яг1л
яг5н
яз1в
як1н
яс1к
яс6т
ят1в
я1а
я1ба
я1бе
я1би
я1бо
я1бу
я1бью
я1бьє
я1бьі
я1бю
я1бя
я1бє
я1бі
я1бї
я1ва
я1ве
я1во
я1ву
я1вью
я1вьє
я1вьі
я1вю
я1вя
я1вє
я1га
я1ге
я1ги
я1го
я1гу
я1гью
я1гьє
я1гьі
я1гю
я1гя
я1гє
я1гі
я1гї
я1да
я1де
я1ди
я1до
я1ду
я1дью
я1дьє
я1дьі
я1дю
я1дя
я1дє
я1ді
я1дї
я1е
я1жа
я1же
я1жи
я1жо
я1жу
я1жью
я1жьє
я1жьі
я1жю
я1жя
я1жє
я1жі
я1жї
я1за
я1зе
я1зи
я1зо
я1зу
я1зью
я1зьє
я1зьі
я1зю
я1зя
я1зє
я1зі
я1зї
я1и
я1ка
я1ке
я1ки
я1ко
я1ку
я1кью
я1кьє
я1кьі
я1кю
я1кя
я1кє
я1кі
я1кї
я1ла
я1ле
я1ли
я1ло
я1лу
я1лью
я1льє
я1льі
я1лю
я1ля
я1лє
я1лі
я1лї
я1ма
я1ме
я1ми
я1мо
я1му
я1мью
я1мьє
я1мьі
я1мю
я1мя
я1мє
я1мі
я1мї
я1на
я1не
я1ни
я1но
я1ну
я1нью
я1ньє
я1ньі
я1ню
я1ня
я1нє
я1ні
я1о2
я1па
я1пе
я1пи
я1по
я1пу
я1пью
я1пьє
я1пьі
я1пю
я1пя
я1пє
я1пі
я1ра
я1ре
я1ри
я1ро
я1ру
я1рью
я1рьє
я1рьі
я1рю
я1ря
я1рє
я1рі
я1рї
я1са
я1се
я1си
я1со
я1ста
я1сте
я1сти
я1сто
я1сту
я1стью
я1стьє
я1стьі
я1стю
я1стя
я1стє
я1сті
я1стї
я1су
я1сью
я1сьє
я1сьі
я1сю
я1ся
я1сє
я1сі
я1сї
я1та
я1те
я1ти
я1то
я1ту
я1тью
я1тьє
я1тьі
я1тю
я1тя
я1тє
я1у
я1фа
я1фе
я1фи
я1фо
я1фу
я1фью
я1фьє
я1фьі
я1фю
я1фя
я1фє
я1фі
я1фї
я1ха
я1хе
я1хи
я1хо
я1ху
я1хью
я1хьє
я1хьі
я1хю
я1хя
я1хє
я1хі
я1хї
я1ца
я1це
я1ци
я1цо
я1цу
я1цє
я1ці
я1цї
я1ча
я1че
я1чи
я1чу
я1чью
я1чьє
я1чьі
я1чє
я1чі
я1чї
я1ша
я1ше
я1ши
я1шо
я1шу
я1шью
я1шьє
я1шьі
я1шє
я1ші
я1шї
я1ща
я1ще
я1щи
я1що
я1щу
я1щью
я1щьє
я1щьі
я1щє
я1щі
я1щї
я1ю
я1я
я1є
я1і
я1ї
я2вл
я5стр
я5тр
я5ті
я5тї
єа2дє
єа2з
єа6да
єво2с
єв1ч
єв2ним
єв2нят
єв2нім
єв2п
єв6ку
єг1ла.
єг1ли
єг1ло
єг1н
єг6нат
єдоу5к
єжа6т
єж1м
єж1р
єз1во
єз1да
єз1др
єз5ви
єз5ві
єи2г
єи2д
єи2м
єкс2п
єк1н
єк1ск
єк1сту
єм1нє
єм1ч
єн1ри
єн1рі
єн1рї
єн5рє
єоб1л
єо1с
єо2б
єо2ж
єо2кон
єо2пр
єо2ру
єо2са
єо2сє
єо2ч
єо2щ
єо6св
єо6су
єо6хв
єо6ш
єп1лє
єп1та
єп1то
єп5ли.
єп5лі.
єп5лї.
єп5тич
єп5тур
єп5тє
єп5тіч
єп5тїч
єрис2
єри1ск
єро6б
єрє1дв
єрє1зв
єрє1п
єрє1сс
єрє5гн
єріс2
єрі1ск
єрїс2
єрї1ск
єр1ае
єр1ват
єр1тя
єр2хи
єр2хі
єр2хї
єр5тли
єр5тлі
єр5тлї
єр6кл
єскрип1
єскріп1
єскрїп1
єс1п
єс1тар
єс5ва
єс5кур
єс5ра
єтора5
єу3то
єх1м
єх5об
єш1то
єі2г
єі2д
єі2м
єї2г
єї2д
єї2м
є1а
є1ба
є1би
є1бо
є1бр
є1бу
є1бью
є1бьє
є1бьі
є1бю
є1бя
є1бє
є1бі
є1бї
є1ва
є1ви
є1во
є1ву
є1вью
є1вьє
є1вьі
є1вю
є1вя
є1вє
є1ві
є1га
є1гд
є1ги
є1го
є1гу
є1гью
є1гьє
є1гьі
є1гю
є1гя
є1гє
є1гі
є1гї
є1да
є1ди
є1до
є1ду
є1дью
є1дьє
є1дьі
є1дю
є1дя
є1дє
є1ді
є1дї
є1е
є1жа
є1жж
є1жо
є1жу
є1жью
є1жьє
є1жьі
є1жю
є1жя
є1жє
є1за
є1зи
є1зо
є1зу
є1зью
є1зьє
є1зьі
є1зю
є1зя
є1зє
є1зі
є1зї
є1и
є1ка
є1кв
є1ки
є1ку
є1кью
є1кьє
є1кьі
є1кю
є1кя
є1кє
є1кі
є1кї
є1ла
є1ли
є1ло
є1лу
є1лью
є1льє
є1льі
є1лю
є1ля
є1лє
є1лі
є1лї
є1ма
є1ми
є1мо
є1му
є1мью
є1мьє
є1мьі
є1мю
є1мя
є1мє
є1на
є1ни
є1но
є1ну
є1нью
є1ньє
є1ньі
є1ню
є1ня
є1нє
є1ні
є1па
є1пи
є1по
є1пу
є1пью
є1пьє
є1пьі
є1пю
є1пя
є1пє
є1пі
є1ра
є1ри
є1ро
є1ру
є1рью
є1рьє
є1рьі
є1рю
є1ря
є1рє
є1рі
є1рї
є1са
є1сб
є1сд
є1си
є1ск
є1см
є1со
є1ста
є1ств
є1сти
є1сто
є1стр
є1сту
є1стью
є1стьє
є1стьі
є1стю
є1стя
є1стє
є1сті
є1стї
є1су
є1сью
є1сьє
є1сьі
є1сю
є1ся
є1сє
є1сі
є1сї
є1с2г
є1та
є1тв
є1ти
є1тл
є1то
є1тр
є1ту
є1тью
є1тьє
є1тьі
є1тю
є1тя
є1тє
є1ті
є1тї
є1у2
є1фа
є1фи
є1фо
є1фу
є1фью
є1фьє
є1фьі
є1фю
є1фя
є1фє
є1фі
є1фї
є1ха
є1хи
є1хо
є1ху
є1хью
є1хьє
є1хьі
є1хю
є1хя
є1хє
є1хі
є1хї
є1ца
є1ци
є1цо
є1цу
є1цє
є1ці
є1цї
є1ча
є1чи
є1чу
є1чью
є1чьє
є1чьі
є1чє
є1чі
є1чї
є1ша
є1ши
є1шл
є1шо
є1шта
є1шу
є1шью
є1шьє
є1шьі
є1шє
є1ші
є1шї
є1ща
є1щи
є1що
є1щу
є1щью
є1щьє
є1щьі
є1щє
є1щі
є1щї
є1ю
є1я
є1є
є1і
є1ї
є2вро
є2д1ап
є2д1ию
є2д1ію
є2д1їю
є2оди
є2оді
є2одї
є2она
є2оро
є2р1у2п
є2с3пу
є2єва
є3ола
є3он.
є5г6но
є5джє
є5жи
є5жі
є5жї
є5мі
є5мї
є5оли
є5оля
є5ол.
є5охл
є5ста.
є6д5у6г
є6стиг
є6стіг
є6стїг
є6єма
іас2
іа1ск
іг1н
іді3ом
іді5а
ід1ц
ізг1не
ізг1нє
ізи1с
ізо1т
ізо2о
із'5
із1в
із1д
із2ва
із2гн
із5ре
із5рє
ікс1ту
ік1н
ік1ск
іле1п
ілє1п
ім1н
іно5с
інс2
ін1атом
ін1р
іос2
іо2ста
іо5сп
іп1ту
ір5в
іск1н
іст1в
іс1б
іс1к
іс1м
іс1п
іс1тек
іс1тєк
іс1ч
іс2пас
іс5тец
іс5тєц
іт1ва
іт1ве
іт1вє
іт1уч
іт5ву
іу2г
іу2ч
іу6р
ія2д
іі2з
і1а
і1ба
і1бе
і1би
і1бо
і1бу
і1бью
і1бьє
і1бьі
і1бю
і1бя
і1бє
і1бі
і1ва
і1ве
і1во
і1ву
і1вью
і1вьє
і1вьі
і1вю
і1вя
і1вє
і1ві
і1в2с
і1га
і1ге
і1ги
і1гл
і1го
і1гу
і1гью
і1гьє
і1гьі
і1гю
і1гя
і1гє
і1гі
і1да
і1де
і1ди
і1до
і1др
і1ду
і1дью
і1дьє
і1дьі
і1дю
і1дя
і1дє
і1ді
і1е
і1жа
і1же
і1жж
і1жо
і1жу
і1жью
і1жьє
і1жьі
і1жю
і1жя
і1жє
і1жі
і1за
і1зе
і1зи
і1зна
і1зо
і1зр
і1зу
і1зью
і1зьє
і1зьі
і1зю
і1зя
і1зє
і1зі
і1и
і1ка
і1кв
і1ке
і1ки
і1ко
і1ку
і1кью
і1кьє
і1кьі
і1кю
і1кя
і1кє
і1кі
і1ла
і1ле
і1ли
і1ло
і1лу
і1лью
і1льє
і1льі
і1лю
і1ля
і1лє
і1лі
і1ма
і1ме
і1ми
і1мо
і1му
і1мью
і1мьє
і1мьі
і1мю
і1мя
і1мє
і1на
і1не
і1ни
і1но
і1ну
і1нью
і1ньє
і1ньі
і1ня
і1нє
і1ні
і1н1ю
і1о
і1па
і1пи
і1пл
і1по
і1пс
і1пу
і1пью
і1пьє
і1пьі
і1пю
і1пя
і1пі
і1ра
і1ре
і1ри
і1ро
і1ру
і1рью
і1рьє
і1рьі
і1рю
і1ря
і1рє
і1рі
і1са
і1се
і1си
і1со
і1ста
і1сте
і1сти
і1сто
і1стра
і1сту
і1стью
і1стьє
і1стьі
і1стю
і1стя
і1стє
і1сті
і1су
і1сью
і1сьє
і1сьі
і1сю
і1ся
і1сє
і1сі
і1с2ні
і1те
і1ти
і1тл
і1то
і1тр
і1ту
і1тью
і1тьє
і1тьі
і1тю
і1тя
і1тє
і1ті
і1у
і1фа
і1фе
і1фо
і1фу
і1фью
і1фьє
і1фьі
і1фю
і1фя
і1фє
і1фі
і1ха
і1хе
і1хи
і1хо
і1ху
і1хью
і1хьє
і1хьі
і1хю
і1хя
і1хє
і1хі
і1ца
і1це
і1цо
і1цу
і1цє
і1ці
і1ча
і1че
і1чу
і1чью
і1чьє
і1чьі
і1чє
і1чі
і1ша
і1ше
і1шл
і1шо
і1шу
і1шью
і1шьє
і1шьі
і1шє
і1ші
і1ш2п
і1ща
і1ще
і1що
і1щу
і1щью
і1щьє
і1щьі
і1щє
і1щі
і1ю
і1я
і1є
і1і
і2ап
і2аф
і2а1г
і2дей
і2дєй
і2л1а2ц
і2мено
і2мєно
і2ок6
і2опр
і2ох
і2оц
і2о1ск
і2п1ли
і2с'
і2т1уп
і2юл
і2юн
і3орт
і5гд
і5к6ч
і5мі
і5оле
і5олє
і5пе
і5пє
і5та
і6п5тіз
і6тот
їд1ц
їле1п
їм1н
ї1сти
ї1ти
ї1ту
ї1хе
ї1хи
ї1хо
ї1ху
ї1ца
ї1це
ї1цо
ї1цу
ї1цє
ї1ча
ї1че
ї1чу
